District of Columbia statutes.
31-3916

Repealed

Captive Insurance Regulatory and Supervision Trust Account.

Repealed.

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-192, § 17, 47 DCR 7320
Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-262, § 24(a), 52 DCR 1205
For temporary (225 day) additions, see § 4(c) of Captive Insurance Company Enhancement Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-215, December 7, 2004, law notification 52 DCR 459).
For temporary (90 day) additions, see § 4(c) of the Captive Insurance Company Enhancement Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-481, July 19, 2004, 51 DCR 7811).
For temporary (90 day) additions, see § 4(c) of Captive Insurance Company Enhancement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-549, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 10336).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section and transition provisions, see § 24 of Captive Insurance Company Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-640, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1238).